/*chrysoprase*/
borland
Academic Phrasebank
    1- Introducing Work
    3- Describing Methods
    5- Being Critical
    9- Discussing Findings
        Reporting Results
        Referring to the Literature
    10 - Writing Conclusions
        General Functions
        Useful Links
        Home
Introducing Work
    Writing Introductions
        There are many ways to introduce an academic essay or assignment. Most academic writers, however, appear to do one or more of the following in their introductions:
            establish the context, background and/or importance of the topic
            indicate a problem, controversy or a gap in the field of study
            define the topic or key terms
            state of the purpose of the essay/writing
            provide an overview of the coverage and/or structure of the writing
            Examples of phrases which are commonly employed to realise these functions are listed below. Note that there may be a certain amount of overlap between some of the categories under which the phrases are listed.

        Introductory sections for research dissertations, are normally much more complex than this and, as well as the elements above, may include the following: a synopsis of key literature/current state of knowledge, synopsis of methods, lists of research questions or hypotheses to be tested, significance of the study, recognition of the limitations of the study, reasons for personal interest in the topic.
            Establishing the importance of the topic:
                One of the mst significant current discussions in legal and moral philosophy is ....
                It is becoming increasingly difficult to ignore the ....
                X is the leading cause of death in western industrialised countries.
                X is a common disorder characterised by ....
                X plays an important role in the maintenance of ....
                X is an important component in the climate system, and plays a key role in Y.
                In the new global economy, X has become a central issue for ....
                In the history of development economics, X has been thought of as a key factor in ....
                Xs are one of the most widely used groups of antibacterial agents and ....
                Xs are the most potent anti-inflammatory agents known.
                X is a major public health problem, and the cause of about 4% of the global burden of disease.
                X is an increasingly important area in applied linguistics.
                Central to the entire discipline of X is the concept of ....
                X is at the heart of our understanding of ....
                A key aspect of X is ....
            Establishing the importance of the topic (time frame given):
                Recent developments in X have heightened the need for ....
                In recent years, there has been an increasing interest in ....
                Recent developments in the field of X have led to a renewed interest in ....
                Recently, researchers have shown an increased interest in ......
                The past decade has seen the rapid development of X in many ....
                The past thirty years have seen increasingly rapid advances in the field of ....
                Over the past century there has been a dramatic increase in ....
                One of the most important events of the 1970s was ....
                Traditionally, Xs have subscribed to the belief that ....
                X proved an important literary genre in the early Y community.
                The changes experienced by Xs over the past decade remain unprecedented.
                Xs are one of the most widely used groups of antibacterial agents and have been extensively used for decades to ....
            Highlighting a problem in the field of study:
                    However, these rapid changes are having a serious effect ....
                    However, a major problem with this kind of application is ....
                    Lack of X has existed as a health problem for many years.
                    Despite its safety and efficacy, X suffers from several major drawbacks:
                    However, research has consistently shown that first year students have not attained an adequate understanding of ...
                    There is increasing concern that some Xs are being disadvantaged ....
                    Despite its long clinical success, X has a number of problems in use.
                    Questions have been raised about the safety of prolonged use of ....
            Highlighting a controversy in the field of study:
                To date there has been little agreement on what ....
                More recently, literature has emerged that offers contradictory findings about ....
                One observer has already drawn attention to the paradox in ....
                In many Xs a debate is taking place between Ys and Zs concerning ....
                The controversy about scientific evidence for X has raged unabated for over a century.
                Debate continues about the best strategies for the management of ....
                This concept has recently been challenged by .... studies demonstrating ….
                One of the most significant current discussions in legal and moral philosophy is ....
                One observer has already drawn attention to the paradox in ....
                In many Xs a debate is taking place between Ys and Zs concerning ....
                The controversy about scientific evidence for X has raged unabated for over a century.
                Questions have been raised about the safety of prolonged use of ....
                The issue of X has been a controversial and much disputed subject within the field of ....
                The issue has grown in importance in light of recent ....
                One major theoretical issue that has dominated the field for many years concerns ....
                One major issue in early X research concerned ....
            Highlighting a knowledge gap in the field of study (for research):
                So far, however, there has been little discussion about ....
                However, far too little attention has been paid to ....
                Most studies in X have only been carried out in a small number of areas.
                The research to date has tended to focus on X rather than Y.
                In addition, no research has been found that surveyed ....
                So far this method has only been applied to ....
                Several studies have produced estimates of X (Smith, 2002; Jones, 2003), but there is still insufficient data for ....
                However, there have been no controlled studies which compare differences in ....
                The experimental data are rather controversial, and there is no general agreement about ....
                However, there is no reliable evidence that ....
                X's analysis does not take account of .... nor does he examine ....
    Focus, aim, argument:
        This paper will focus on/examine/give an account of ....
        This essay seeks to remedy these problems by analyisng the literature of ....
        The objectives of this research are to determine whether ....
        This paper seeks to address the following questions:
        This essay critically examines/discusses/traces ....
        The purpose of this paper is to review recent research into the ....
        This paper will review the research conducted on ....
        This chapter reviews the literature concerning the usefulness of using ....
        The aim of this paper is to determine/examine ....
        The aim of this study was to evaluate and validate ....
        In this paper I argue that ....
        In the pages that follow, it will be argued that ....
        This paper attempts to show that ....
        In this essay, I attempt to defend the view that ....
    Outline of structure:
        The main questions/issues addressed in this paper are: a), b and c).
        This paper has been divided into four parts. The first part deals with ....
        The essay has been organised in the following way.
        This paper first gives a brief overview of the recent history of X.
        This paper reviews the evidence for ....
        This paper begins by ...... It will then go on to ....
        The first section of this paper will examine .....
        Finally, .....
        Chapter 2 begins by laying out the theoretical dimensions of the research, and looks at how ....
        Chapter 3 describes the design, synthesis, characterization and evaluation of ....
        The last chapter assesses the ....
    Explaining Keywords
        While a variety of definitions of the term X have been suggested, this paper will use the definition first suggested by Smith (1968) who saw it as ....
        Throughout this paper the term X will refer to/will be used to refer to ....
        In this article the acronym/abbreviation XYZ will be used.
    Referring to literature
                one important characteristic of academic writing is that all the sources of information that the writer has used need to be indicated, not just as a bibliography or list of references, but also in or alongside the text. in some cases the source will be the main subject of the sentence, in others the sources may be mentioned parenthetically (in brackets) or via a notation system (e.g. footnotes). the more common verbs and verb phrases used in academic writing for referring to sources are given below. note that different referencing systems are used in different disciplines. in the examples, the harvard in-text referencing system has been used. also note that the "author as subject" style is less common in the sciences.
                "ideally, your review should be evaluative and critical of the studies which have a particular bearing on your own. for example, you may think a particular study did not investigate some necessary aspect of the area, or that the authors failed to notice some problem with their results."
                taken from the manchester good practice guide:
                http://www.man.ac.uk/goodpractice/
        General descriptions of the relevant literature:
            A considerable amount of literature has been published on X. These studies ....
            There is a large volume of published studies describing the role of ....
            The first serious discussions and analyses of X emerged during the 1970s with ....
            The generalisability of much published research on this issue is problematic.
            What we know about X is largely based upon empirical studies that investigate how ....
            During the past 30 years much more information has become available on ....
            In recent years, there has been an increasing amount of literature on ....
            A large and growing body of literature has investigated ....
        General reference to previous research/scholarly activity (usually more than one author)
            Many historians have argued that .... (e.g. Jones, 1987; Johnson, 1990; Smith, 1994).
            There is a consensus among social scientisits that ....(e.g. Jones, 1987; Johnson, 1990; Smith, 1994).
            Numerous studies have attempted to explain .... (for example, Smith , 1996; Kelly, 1998; Johnson, 2002)
            Recent evidence suggests that .... (Smith, 1996; Jones 1999; Johnson, 2001)
            Recently, in vitro studies have shown that T.thermophylus EFTu can .... (Patel et al., 1997; Jones et al., 1998).
            Surveys such as that conducted by Smith (1988) have shown that ....
            Several attempts have been made to .... (Smith, 1996; Jones 1999; Johnson, 2001)
            Several studies have revealed that it is not just X that acts on ..... (Smith, 1996; Jones ....
            Several biographies of Harris have been published. Smith presents an .... account, whilst Jones ....
            Several studies investigating X have been carried out on ....
            Data from several sources have identified the increased morbidity and mortality associated with obesity
            Previous studies have reported .... (Smith, 1985; Jones, 1987; Johnson, 1992).
            Previous research findings into X have been inconsistent and contradictory (Smith, 1996; Jones 1999, ....
            A number of studies have found that .... (Smith , 2003; Jones, 2004).
            Twenty cohort study analyses have examined the relationship between ....
            At least 152 case-control studies worldwide have examined the relationship between.....
            Other studies have considered the relationship ....
            The relationship between X and Y has been widely investigated (Smith, 1985; Jones, 1987, ....
            The causes of X have been widely investigated (Jones, 1987; Johnson, 1990; Smith, 1994).
            The geology of X has been addressed in several small-scale investigations and .....
            Xs have been identified as major contributing factors for the decline of many species (1).
            X has also been shown to reverse the anti-inflammatory effects of glucocorticoids in murine-induced arthritis (11).
            It has been suggested that levels of X are independent of the size of the Y (Smith et al., 1995)
            It has conclusively been shown that X and Y increase Z (Smith et al., 1999; Jones, 2001 ....
            It has been demonstrated that a high intake of X results in damage to .... (Smith, 1998; ....
        Reference to current state of knowledge
            A relationship exists between an individual's working memory and their ability to ...... (Jones et al.,1998).
            GM varieties of maize are able to cross-pollinate with non-GM varieties (Smith, 1998; Jones, 1999).
            There is an unambiguous relationship between spending on education and economic development (Rao, 1998).
            X is one of the most intense reactions following CHD (Lane, 2003).
            MIF has been found to oppose the anti-inflammatory actions of X on Y (Alourfi, 2004).
        Reference to single investigations in the past: researcher(s) as sentence subject
            Smith (1999)
            found that as levels of literacy and education of the population rise ....
            showed that reducing X to 190oC decreased .... (see figure 2) .
            demonstrated that when the maximum temperature is exceeded ....
            Jones et al. (2001)
            investigated the differential impact of formal and non-formal education on ....
            analysed the data from 72 countries and concluded that ....
            reviewed the literature from the period and found little evidence for this claim.
            interviewed 250 undergraduate students using semi-structured questionnaires.
            studied the effects of Cytochrome P450 on unprotected nerve cells.
            performed a similar series of experiments in the 1960s to show that ....
            carried out a number of investigations into the ....
            conducted a series of trials in which he mixed X with different quantities of ....
            measured both components of the ....
            labelled these subsets as ....
            examined the flow of international students ....
            identified parents of disabled children as ....
            used a survey to assess the various ....

            Wang et al. (2004) have recently developed a methodology for the selective introduction of ......
        Reference to single investigations or publications in the past: time frame prominent
            In 1975, Smith et al. published a paper in which they described ....
            In 1990 Patel et al. demonstrated that replacement of H2O with heavy water led to ....
            Thirty years later, Smith (1974) reported three cases of Candida Albicans which ....
            In the 1950s Gunnar Myrdal pointed to some of the ways in which …. (Myrdal, 1957)
            In 1981, Smith and co workers demonstrated that X induced in vitro resistance to ....
            In 1990, El-Guerrouj et al. reported a new and convenient synthetic procedure to obtain ....
            In 1984 Jones et al. made several amino acid esters of X and evaluated them as water-soluble pro-drugs.
        Reference to single publication: no time frame
            Smith has written the most complete synthesis to date of ....
        Reference to single investigations in the past: investigation prominent
            Preliminary work on X was undertaken by Abdul Karim (1992).
            The first systematic study of X was reported by Patel et al. in 1986.
            The study of the structural behaviour of X was first carried out by Rao et al. (1986).....
            Analysis of the genes involved in X was first carried out by Smith et al (1983).
            A recent study by Smith and Jones (2012) involved ....
            A longtitudinal study of X by Smith (2012) reports that ....
            A small scale study by Smith (2012) reaches different conclusions, finding no increase in ....
            Smith's cross-country analysis (2012) showed that ....
            Smith's comparative study (2012) found that ....
            Detailed examination of X by Smith and Patel (1961) showed that ....
            In another major study, Zhao (1974) found that just over half of the ....
            In a study which set out to determine X, Smith (2012) found that ....
            In a randomised controlled study of X, Smith (2012) reported that ....
            In an analysis of X, Smith et al. (2012) found ....
            In an investigation into X, Smith et al. (2012) found ....
            In a large longitudinal study, Smith et al. (2012) investigated the incidence of X in Y.
        Reference to single investigations in the past: research topic as subject
            Classical conditioning was first demonstrated experimentally by Pavlov (Smith, 2002). In his seminal study ....
            The electronic spectroscopy of X was first studied by Smith and Douglas 1 in 1970
            The acid-catalyzed condensation reaction between X and Y was first reported by Baeyer in 1872
            X formed the central focus of a study by Smith (2002) in which the author found ....
            X was originally isolated from Y in a soil sample from .... (Wang et al., 1952).
            The way in which the X gene is regulated was studied extensively by Ho and colleagues (Ho et al. 1995 and 1998).
            To determine the effects of X, Zhao et al (2005) compared ....
        Reference to what other writers do in their text (author as subject)
            Smith (2013) identifies poor food, bad housing, inadequate hygiene and large families as the major causes of ....
            Rao (2013) lists three reasons why the English language has become so dominant. These are: ....
            Smith (2013) traces the development of Japanese history and philosophy during the 19th century.
            Jones(2013) provides in-depth analysis of the work of Aristotle showing its relevance to contemporary times.
            Smith (2013) draws our attention to distinctive categories of motivational beliefs often observed in ....
            Smith (2013) defines evidence based medicine as the conscious, explicit and judicious use of .....
            Rao (2013) highlights the need to break the link between economic growth and transport growth .....
            Smith (2013) discusses the challenges and strategies for facilitating and promoting ....
            Toh (2013) mentions the special situation of Singapore as an example of ....
            Smith (2013) questions whether mainstream schools are the best environment for ....
            Smith (2013) considers whether countries work well on cross-border issues such as ....
            Smith (2013) uses examples of these various techniques as evidence that ....

            In her major study,
            In her seminal article,
            In her classic critique of ....,
            In her case study of ...,
            In her review of ....,
            In her analysis of ....,
            In her introduction to ....,'
                    Smith (2012) identifies five characteristics of .......
                    Some analysts (e.g. Carnoy, 2002) have attempted to draw fine distinctions between ....
                    Other authors (see Harbison, 2003; Kaplan, 2004) question the usefulness of such an approach.
        Reference to other writers' ideas (author as subject)
            According to Smith (2003), preventative medicine is far more cost effective, and therefore better adapted to the developing world.
                Smith (2013)	points out
                    argues
                    maintains
                    claims
                    concludes
                    suggests	that
                    preventative medicine is far more cost effective, and therefore better adapted to the developing world
Being Critical
        As an academic writer, you are expected to be critical of the sources that you use. This essentially means questioning what you read and not necessarily agreeing with it just because the information has been published. Being critical can also mean looking for reasons why we should not just accept something as being correct or true. This can require you to identify problems with a writer's arguments or methods, or perhaps to refer to other people's criticisms of these. Constructive criticism goes beyond this by suggesting ways in which a piece of research or writing could be improved.
        ...... being against is not enough. We also need to develop habits of constructive thinking. Edward de Bono
    Introducing questions, problems and limitations (theory)
        One question that needs to be asked, however, is whether ....
        A serious weakness with this argument, however, is that ....
        One of the limitations with this explanation is that it does not explain why... .
        One criticism of much of the literature on X is that ....
        The key problem with this explanation is that ....
        The existing accounts fail to resolve the contradiction between X and Y.
        However, there is an inconsistency with this argument.
        Smith's argument relies too heavily on qualitative analysis of ....
        It seems that Jones' understanding of the X framework is questionable.
        Smith's interpretation overlooks much of the historical research ....
        One major criticism of Smith's work is that ....
        Many writers have challenged Jones' claim on the grounds that ....
        X's analysis does not take account of .... nor does he examine ....
    Introducing questions, problems and limitations (method/practice)
        Another problem with this approach is that it fails to take X into account.
        Perhaps the most serious disadvantage of this method is that ....
        Difficulties arise, however, when an attempt is made to implement the policy.
        Nevertheless, the strategy has not escaped criticism from governments, agencies and academics.
        One major drawback of this approach is that ....
        The main limitation of biosynthetic incorporation, however, is ....
        However, this method of analysis has a number of limitations.
        However, approaches of this kind carry with them various well known limitations.
        All the studies reviewed so far, however, suffer from the fact that ....
        However, there are limits to how far the idea of/concept of X can be taken.
        However, such explanations tend to overlook the fact that ....
        However, one of the problems with the instrument the researchers used to measure X was ....
        However, all the previously mentioned methods suffer from some serious
            limitations
            weaknesses
            disadvantages
            drawbacks.
    Identifying a study's weakness
        (However,)
        the main weakness of the study is the failure to address how ....
        the study fails to consider the differing categories of damage that ....
        the research does not take into account pre-existing .... such as ....
        the author offers no explanation for the distinction between X and Y.
        Smith makes no attempt to differentiate between various different types of X.
        Jones fails to fully acknowledge the significance of ....
        the paper would appear to be over ambitious in its claims.
        the author overlooks the fact that X contributes to Y.
        what Smith fails to do is to draw a distinction between ....
        another weakness is that we are given no explanation of how ....
        Smith fails to fully define what ....
        no attempt was made to quantify the association between X and Y.
    Offering constructive suggestions
        Smith's paper
            Her conclusions
            The study
            The findings
        would have been
            might have been
        more
            much more
            far more
        useful
            convincing

            interesting

            persuasive

            original

        if he/she had
            if the author had
        included ....
            considered ....
            adopted ....
            used ....
        A more comprehensive study would include all the groups of ....
            A better study would examine a large, randomly selected sample of societies with ....
            A much more systematic approach would identify how X interacts with other variables that are believed to be linked to ....
    Using evaluative adjectives to comment on research
        excellent
            In this
            In his/her
                In their
                In this
            excellent
            comprehensive
            detailed
            useful
            thorough
            groundbreaking
            timely
            important
            impressive
        ------------------------
        limited
            small-scale
            exploratory
            analysis (of X),
            examination (of X),
            study (of X),
            survey (of X),
            investigation (into Y),
            Smith (2012)
            Jones et al. (2012)
            found ....
            was/were able to show that ....
            concluded that ....

    Highlighting inadequacies of previous studies
        Most studies in the field of X have only focussed on ....
        Most studies in X have only been carried out in a small number of areas.
        The generalisability of much published research on this issue is problematic.
        The experimental data are rather controversial, and there is no general agreement about ....
        Such expositions are unsatisfactory because they ....
        However, few writers have been able to draw on any structured research into the opinions and attitudes of ....
        The research to date has tended to focus on X rather than Y.
        The existing accounts fail to resolve the contradiction between X and Y.
        Researchers have not treated X in much detail.
        Previous studies of X have not dealt with ....
        However, these studies used non-validated methods to measure ....
        Half of the studies evaluated failed to specify whether ....
        However, much of the research up to now has been descriptive in nature ….
        Although extensive research has been carried out on X, no single study exists which adequately covers ....
        However, these results were based upon data from over 30 years ago and it is unclear if these differences still persist.

    Introducing other people's criticisms
        However, Jones (2003) points out that ....
        Many analysts now argue that the strategy of X has not been successful. Jones (2003), for example, argues that ....
        Non-government agencies are also very critical of the new policies.
        The X theory has been / vigorously / strongly challenged in recent years by a number of writers.
        Smith's analysis has been criticised by a number of writers. Jones (1993), for example, points out that ....
        Smith's meta-analysis has been subjected to considerable criticism.
        The most important of these criticisms is that Smith failed to note that ....
        Jones (2003) is probably the best known critic of the X theory. He argues that ....
        The latter point has been devastatingly critiqued by Jones (2003).
        Critics have also argued that not only do social surveys provide an inaccurate measure of X, but the....
        Critics question the ability of poststructuralist theory to provide ....
        More recent arguments against X have been summarised by Smith and Jones (1982):
        Jones (2003) is critical of the conclusions that Smith draws from his findings.
Describing Methods
        In the Methods section of a dissertation or research article, writers give an account of how they carried out their research.The Materials and Methods section should be clear and detailed enough for another experienced person to repeat the research and reproduce the results. Typical features with examples of this language are listed below.
    Describing previously used methods
        To date various methods have been developed and introduced to measure X:
        In most recent studies, X has been measured in four different ways.
        Traditionally, X has been assessed by measuring….
        This test is widely available, and has been used in many investigational studies.
        Recently, simpler and more rapid tests of X have been developed.
        Radiographic techniques are the main non-invasive method used to determine ....
        Different authors have measured X in a variety of ways.
        Previous studies have based their criteria for selection on ....
        A variety of methods are used to assess X. Each has its advantages and drawbacks.
        Data were gathered from multiple sources at various time points during ....

    Giving reasons why a particular method was adopted or rejected
        The semi-structured approach was chosen because ....
        Smith et al. (1994) identify several advantages of the case study, ....
        It was decided that the best method to adopt for this investigation was to ....
        A case study approach was used to allow a ....
        A case-study approach was chosen since ....
        The design of the questionnaires was based on ....
        The X method is one of the more practical ways of ....
        It was considered that quantitative measures would usefully supplement and extend the qualitative analysis.
        Many of the distributions were not normal so non-parametric signed rank tests were run.
        The X approach has a number of attractive features: ....
        The second advantage of using the multivariate method is ....
        However, there are certain drawbacks associated with the use of ....
        The main disadvantage of the experimental method is that ....
        A major probem with the experimental method is that ....

    Indicating a specific method
        X was prepared according to the procedure used by Patel et al. (1957).
        The synthesis of X was done according to the procedure of Smith (1973).
        X was synthesised using the same method that was detailed for Y, using ....
        This compound was prepared by adapting the procedure used by Zhao et al. (1990).
        For this study, the X was used to explore the subsurface ....
        An alternative method for making scales homogenous is by using ....

    Describing the characteristics of the sample
        The initial sample consisted of 200 students of whom 13 did not complete all of the interviews
        All studies described as using some sort of X procedure were included in the analysis.
        A systematic literature review was conducted of studies that ....
        All of the participants were aged between 18 and 19 at the beginning of the study.....
        Two groups of subjects were interviewed, namely X and Y. The first group were ....
        A random sample of patients with .... was recruited from ....
        Forty-seven students studying X were recruited for this study.
        The students were divided into two groups based on their performance on ....
        The project used a convenience sample of 32 first year modern languages students.
        Just over half the sample (53%) was female, of whom 69% were ....
        Participants were recruited from 15 clinics across ...., covering urban and rural areas ....
        Eligibility criteria required individuals to have received ….
        Five individuals were excluded from the study on the basis of ….
        Eligible women who matched the selection criteria were identified by …
        Semi structured interviews were conducted with 17 male offenders with a mean age of 38 years
        A comparison group of 12 male subjects without any history of X was drawn from a pool of ….
        Articles were searched from January 1965 until April 2010.
        Publications were only included in the analysis if .…

    Indicating reasons for sample characteristics
        A small sample was chosen because of the expected difficulty of obtaining ....
        The subjects were selected on the basis of a degree of homogeneity of their ....
        Criteria for selecting the subjects were as follows:

    Describing the process: infinitive of purpose
        In order to identify the T10 and T11 spinous processes, the subjects were asked to ....
        In order to understand how X regulates Y, a series of transfections was performed.
        To enable the subjects to see the computer screen clearly, the laptop was configured with ....
        To see if the two methods gave the same measurement, the data was plotted and ....
        To control for bias, measurements were carried out by another person.
        To measure X, a question asking .... was used.
        To determine whether ..., KG-1 cells were incubated for ....
        To establish whether ....,
        To increase the reliability of measures, each X was tested twice with a 4-min break between ....
        To compare the scores three weeks after initial screening, a global ANOVA F-test was used

        The vials were capped with .... to prevent volatisation.
        In an attempt to make each interviewee feel as comfortable as possible, the interviewer ....
        Describing the process: other phrases expressing purpose

        For the purpose of height measurement, subjects were asked to stand ....
        For the purpose of analysis, 2 segments were extracted from each ....
        For the estimation of protein concentration, 100 µL of protein sample was mixed with ....

    Describing the process: typical verbs (note use of passive form)
        Data management and analysis was performed using SPSS 8.0 (1999).
        Published studies were identified using a search strategy developed in ....
        The experiments were carried out over the course of the growing period from ....
        Injection solutions were coded by a colleague to reduce experimenter bias.
        Drugs were administered by icv injection under brief CO2 narcosis;
        The mean score for the two trials was subjected to multivariate analysis of variance to determine ....
        The subjects were asked to pay close attention to the characters whenever ....
        Prompts were used as an aid to question two so that ....
        The pilot interviews were conducted informally by the trained interviewer ....
        Blood samples were obtained with consent, from 256 caucasian male patients ....
        Independent tests were carried out on the x and y scores for the four years from ....
        This experiment was repeated under conditions in which the poor signal/noise ratio was improved.
        Significance levels were set at the 1% level using the student t-test.
        A total of 256 samples were taken from 52 boreholes (Figure 11).
        The experiments were run using custom software written in....
        Two sets of anonymised questionnaires were completed by ....
        Article references were searched further for additional relevant publications.

    Describing the process: sequence words/phrases
        Prior to commencing the study, ethical clearance was sought from ....
        In the end, the EGO was selected as the measurement tool for the current study.

        After "training", the subjects were told that the characters stood for X and that their task was to ....
            After collection, the samples were shipped back to X in ....
            After conformational analysis of X, it was necessary to ....

        Once the Xs were located and marked, a thin clear plastic ruler ....
            Once the positions had been decided upon, the Xs were removed from each Y and replaced by ....
            Once the exposures were completed, the X was removed from the Y and placed in ......
            On completion of X, the process of model specification and parameter estimation was carried out.

        Following this, the samples were recovered and stored overnight at ....
            These ratings were then made for the ten stimuli to which the subject had been exposed ......
            The analysis was checked when initially performed and then checked again at the end of ......
            The subjects were then shown a film individually and were asked to ......
            The soil was then weighed again, and this weight was recorded as ....
            The results were corrected for the background readings and then averaged before being converted to......
            Finally, questions were asked as to the role of ......

    Describing the process: adverbs of manner
        The soil was then placed in a furnace and gradually heated up to .....
        The vials were shaken manually to allow the soil to mix well with the water.
        The medium was then aseptically transferred to a conical flask.
        The resulting solution was gently mixed at room temperature for ten minutes and ......
        A sample of the concentrate was then carefully injected into ....
        The tubes were accurately reweighed to six decimal places using ....

    Describing the process: passive verb + using .... for instruments
        15 subjects were recruited using email advertisements requesting healthy students from ....
        All the work on the computer was carried out using Quattro Pro for Windows and ......l.
        Data were collected using two high spectral resolution spectroradiometers.
        The data was recorded on a digital audio recorder and transcribed using a ....
        Semi-automated genotyping was carried out using X software and ....
        Statistical significance was analysed using analysis of variance and t-tests as appropriate.
        Comparisons between the two groups were made using unrelated t-tests.

        Using the X-ray and looking at the actual X, it was possible to identify ....
        Using an Anthos Microplate Reader, we were able to separate single cells into different ....
        Describing the process: giving detailed information

        Compounds 3 and 5 were dissolved in X at apparent pH 2.5 to give concentrations of 4mM ....
        .... and the solutions were degraded at 55°C or 37°C for a total time of 42 hours.
        At intervals of 0.5 min, 50 µLof the X was aliquoted into 0.5mL of cooled boric acid buffer (pH 7.5) to ....

    Indicating problems or limitations
        In this investigation there are several sources for error. The main error is ....
        Another major source of uncertainty is in the method used to calculate X..
        It was not possible to investigate the significant relationships of X and Y further because the sample size was too small.
        Further data collection is required to determine exactly how X affects Y.

Reporting Results
        The standard approach to this section of a dissertation is to merely present the results, without elaborate discussion or comment. This does not mean that you do not need any text to describe data presented in tables and figures. Writers usually comment on the significant data presented in the tables and figures. This often takes the form of the location or summary statement, which identifies the table or figure and indicates its content. This is normally followed by a statement or statements which point out and describe the relevant or significant data. All your tables should be numbered and given a title.
        More elaborate commentary on the results is normally restricted to the Discussion section. In research articles, however, authors may comment extensively on their results as they are presented, and it is not uncommon for the Results section to be combined with the Discussion section under the heading: Results and Discussion.
            Reference to aim/method
                To assess X, the Y questionnaire was used.
                To distinguish between these two possibilities, ......
                To compare the scores three weeks after initial screening, a global ANOVA F-test was used
                In order to assess Z, repeated-measures ANOVAs were used.
                Regression analysis was used to predict the ......
                Changes in X and Y were compared using ......
                The average scores of X and Y were compared in order to ......
                Nine items on the questionnaire measured the extent to which ......
                The correlation between X and Y was tested.
                The first set of analyses examined the impact of ......
                Simple statistical analysis was used to ......
                A scatter diagram and a Pearson's product moment correlation were used to determine the relationship between ......
                T-tests were used to analyse the relationship between ......
                Comparisons between the two groups were made using unrelated t-tests.

        Location and summary statements:
                Table 1
                Figure 1

                shows
                compares

                presents

                provides

                the experimental data on X.

                the results obtained from the preliminary analysis of X.

                the intercorrelations among the nine measures of X.

                The results obtained from the preliminary analysis of X

                are shown
                can be compared

                are presented

                in Table 1.
                in Fig 1.

                As shown in Figure 12.1,
                As can be seen from the table (above),

                It can be seen from the data in Table 12.1 that

                From the graph above we can see that

                the X group reported significantly more Y than the other two groups.

                The table below illustrates

                The pie chart above shows

                some of the main characteristics of the ......
                the breakdown of ......

            Highlighting significant data in a table/chart
                It is apparent from this table that very few ......
                This table is quite revealing in several ways. First, unlike the other tables ......
                Data from this table can be compared with the data in Table 4.6 which shows ......
                From the data in Figure 9, it is apparent that the length of time left between ......
                From this data we can see that Study 2 resulted in the lowest value of ......
                The histogram in Fig 1. indicates that ......
                What is interesting in this data is that ......
                In Fig.10 there is a clear trend of decreasing ......
                As Table III shows, there is a significant difference (t = -2.15, p = 0.03) between the two groups.
                The differences between X and Y are highlighted in Table 4
                Statements of result (positive)

                Strong evidence of X was found when ......
                This result is significant at the p = 0.05 level.
                There was a significant positive correlation between ......
                There was a signifcant difference between the two conditions ......
                On average, Xs were shown to have ......
                The mean score for X was ......
                Interestingly, for those subjects with X, ......
                A positive correlation was found between X and Y.
                The results, as shown in Table 1, indicate that ….
                Further analysis showed that ......
                Further statistical tests revealed .....
            Statements of result (negative)
                There was no increase of X associated with .....
                There were no significant differences between ......
                No significant differences were found between .....
                No increase in X was detected.
                No difference greater than X was observed.
                The Chi-square test did not show any significant differences between ......
                None of these differences were statistically significant.
                Overall, X did not affect males and females differently in these measure.
                No significant reduction in  X was found with Y compared with placebo.
                A clear benefit of  X in the prevention of Y could not be identified in this analysis.

            Highlighting significant, interesting or surprising results

                The most striking result to emerge from the data is that ......
                    Interestingly, this correlation is related to .....
                    The correlation between X and Y is interesting because ......
                    The more surprising correlation is with the ......
                    The single most striking observation to emerge from the data comparison was ......

            Reporting results from questionnaires and interviews

                The response rate was 60% at six months and 56% at 12 months.
                Of the study population, 90 subjects completed and returned the questionnaire.
                Of the initial cohort of 123 students, 66 were female and 57 male.
                Thirty-two individuals returned the questionnaires.

                The majority of respondents/those who responded felt that .....
                Over half of those surveyed reported that ......
                70% of those who were interviewed indicated that ......
                Almost two-thirds of the participants (64%) said that ......

                Approximately half of those surveyed did not comment on ......
                A small number of those interviewed suggested that ......
                Only a small number of respondents indicated that ......
                Of the 148 patients who completed the questionnaire, just over half indicated that .......
                A minority of participants (17%) indicated ......

                In response to Question 1, most of those surveyed indicated that ......
                The overall response to this question was very positive.
                When the subject were asked ......, the majority commented that .....
                Other responses to this question included ......
                The overall response to this question was poor.
                Some participants expressed the belief that …..
                One individual stated that …. And another commented …….

            Transition statements
                Turning now to the experimental evidence on ......
                Comparing the two results, it can be seen that ......
                A comparison of the two results reveals ......
                If we now turn to ......

        The term discussion has a variety of meanings in English. In academic writing, however, it usually refers to two types of activity: a) considering both sides of an issue, or question, b) considering the results of research and the implications of these. Discussion sections in dissertations and research articles are probably the most complex in terms of their elements. The most common elements and some of the language that is typically associated with them are listed below:
        Background information (reference to literature or to research aim/question)
        A strong relationship between X and Y has been reported in the literature.
            Prior studies that have noted the importance of ....
            In reviewing the literature, no data was found on the association between X and Y.
            As mentioned in the literature review, ....
            Very little was found in the literature on the question of ....
            This study set out with the aim of assessing the importance of X in ....
            The third question in this research was ....
            It was hypothesized that participants with a history of ....
            The present study was designed to determine the effect of ....
            Statements of result (usually with reference to results section)

        The results of this study show/indicate that ....
            This experiment did not detect any evidence for ....
            On the question of X, this study found that ....
            The current study found that ....
            The most interesting finding was that ....
            Another important finding was that ....
            The results of this study did not show that .../did not show any significant increase in ....
            In the current study, comparing X with Y showed that the mean degree of ....
            In this study, Xs were found to cause ....
            X provided the largest set of significant clusters of ....
            It is interesting to note that in all seven cases of this study....

        Unexpected outcome
            Surprisingly, X was found to ....
            Surprisingly, no differences were found in ....
            One unanticipated finding was that ....
            It is somewhat surprising that no X was noted in this condition ....
            What is surprising is that ....
            Contrary to expectations, this study did not find a significant difference between ....
            However, the observed difference between X and Y in this study was not significant.
            However, the ANOVA (one way) showed that these results were not statistically significant.
            This finding was unexpected and suggests that ....

        Reference to previous research (support)
            This study produced results which corroborate the findings of a great deal of the previous work in this field.
            The findings of the current study are consistent with those of Smith and Jones (2001) who found ....
            This finding supports previous research into this brain area which links X and Y.
            This study confirms that X is associated with ....
            This finding corroborates the ideas of Smith and Jones (2008), who suggested that ....
            This finding is in agreement with Smith's (1999) findings which showed ....
            It is encouraging to compare this figure with that found by Jones (1993) who found that ....
            There are similarities between the attitudes expressed by X in this study and those described by (Smith, 1987, 1995) and Jones (1986)
            These findings further support the idea of ....
            Increased activation in the PCC in this study corroborates these earlier findings.
            These results are consistent with those of other studies and suggest that ....
            The present findings seem to be consistent with other research which found ....
            This also accords with our earlier observations, which showed that ....
            Reference to previous research (contradict)

            However, the findings of the current study do not support the previous research.
            This study has been unable to demonstrate that ....
            However, this result has not previously been described.
            In contrast to earlier findings, however, no evidence of X was detected.
            Although, these results differ from some published studies (Smith, 1992; Jones, 1996), they are consistent with those of ......
            These results differ from X's 2003 estimate of Y, but they are broadly consistent with earlier ....

        Explanations for results:
            There are several possible explanations for this result.
            These differences can be explained in part by the proximity of X and Y.
            A possible explanation for this might be that ....
            Another possible explanation for this is that ....
            This result may be explained by the fact that ..../ by a number of different factors.
            It is difficult to explain this result, but it might be related to ....
            It seems possible that these results are due to ......
            The reason for this is not clear but it may have something to do with ....
            It may be that these students benefitted from ....
            This inconsistency/discrepancy may be due to ....
            This rather contradictory result may be due to ....
            These factors may explain the relatively good correlation between X and Y.
            There are, however, other possible explanations.
            The possible interference of X can not be ruled out.
            The observed increase in X could be attributed to ....
            The observed correlation between X and Y might be explained in this way. .....
            Some authors 9,30 have speculated that ....
            Since this difference has not been found elsewhere it is probably not due to ....
            A possible explanation for some of our results may be the lack of adequate ....

        Advising cautious interpretation
            These data must be interpreted with caution because ....
            These results therefore need to be interpreted with caution.
            However, with a small sample size, caution must be applied, as the findings might not be transferable to ....
            These findings cannot be extrapolated to all patients.
            Although exclusion of X did not reduce the effect on X, these results should be interpreted with caution.
            However, with a small sample size, caution must be applied, as the findings might not be transferable to ....
            It is important to bear in mind the possible bias in these responses.

        Suggesting general hypotheses
            The value of X suggests that a weak link may exist between ....
            It is therefore likely that such connections exist between ....
            It can thus be suggested that ....
            It is possible to hypothesise that these conditions are less likely to occur in ....
            It is possible/likely/probable therefore that ....
            Hence, it could conceivably be hypothesised that ....
            These findings suggest that ....
            It may be the case therefore that these variations ....
            In general, therefore, it seems that ....
            It is possible, therefore, that ....
            Therefore, X could be a major factor, if not the only one, causing ....
            It can therefore be assumed that the ....
            This finding, while preliminary, suggests that .…

    Noting implications
            This finding has important implications for developing ....
                An implication of this is the possibility that ....
                One of the issues that emerges from these findings is ....
                Some of the issues emerging from this finding relate specifically to ....
                This combination of findings provides some support for the conceptual premise that ....
                These findings may help us to understand ....
                These results provide further support for the hypothesis that ....
                Commenting on findings
            However, these results were not very encouraging.
                These findings are rather disappointing.
                The test was successful as it was able to identify students who ....
                The present results are significant in at least major two respects.
                These findings will doubtless be much scrutinized, but there are some immediately dependable conclusions for .…
                The results of this study do not explain the occurrence of these adverse events.

Suggestions for future work
            However, more research on this topic needs to be undertaken before the association between X and Y is more clearly understood.
                Further research should be done to investigate the .....
                Research questions that could be asked include ....
                Future studies on the current topic are therefore recommended.
                A further study with more focus on X is therefore suggested.
                Further studies, which take these variables into account, will need to be undertaken.
                Further work is required to establish this.
                In future investigations it might be possible to use a different X in which ....
                This is an important issue for future research.
                Several questions reamain unanwswered at present.
                There is abundant room for further progress in determining ....

Discussions
    The term discussion has a variety of meanings in English. In academic writing, however, it usually refers to two types of activity: a) considering both sides of an issue, or question, b) considering the results of research and the implications of these. Discussion sections in dissertations and research articles are probably the most complex in terms of their elements. The most common elements and some of the language that is typically associated with them are listed below:
        Background information (reference to literature or to research aim/question)
            A strong relationship between X and Y has been reported in the literature.
            Prior studies that have noted the importance of ....
            In reviewing the literature, no data was found on the association between X and Y.
            As mentioned in the literature review, ....
            Very little was found in the literature on the question of ....
            This study set out with the aim of assessing the importance of X in ....
            The third question in this research was ....
            It was hypothesized that participants with a history of ....
            The present study was designed to determine the effect of ....
            Statements of result (usually with reference to results section)

    The results of this study show/indicate that ....
        This experiment did not detect any evidence for ....
        On the question of X, this study found that ....
        The current study found that ....
        The most interesting finding was that ....
        Another important finding was that ....
        The results of this study did not show that .../did not show any significant increase in ....
        In the current study, comparing X with Y showed that the mean degree of ....
        In this study, Xs were found to cause ....
        X provided the largest set of significant clusters of ....
        It is interesting to note that in all seven cases of this study....

    Unexpected outcome
        Surprisingly, X was found to ....
        Surprisingly, no differences were found in ....
        One unanticipated finding was that ....
        It is somewhat surprising that no X was noted in this condition ....
        What is surprising is that ....
        Contrary to expectations, this study did not find a significant difference between ....
        However, the observed difference between X and Y in this study was not significant.
        However, the ANOVA (one way) showed that these results were not statistically significant.
        This finding was unexpected and suggests that ....

    Reference to previous research (support)
        This study produced results which corroborate the findings of a great deal of the previous work in this field.
        The findings of the current study are consistent with those of Smith and Jones (2001) who found ....
        This finding supports previous research into this brain area which links X and Y.
        This study confirms that X is associated with ....
        This finding corroborates the ideas of Smith and Jones (2008), who suggested that ....
        This finding is in agreement with Smith's (1999) findings which showed ....
        It is encouraging to compare this figure with that found by Jones (1993) who found that ....
        There are similarities between the attitudes expressed by X in this study and those described by (Smith, 1987, 1995) and Jones (1986)
        These findings further support the idea of ....
        Increased activation in the PCC in this study corroborates these earlier findings.
        These results are consistent with those of other studies and suggest that ....
        The present findings seem to be consistent with other research which found ....
        This also accords with our earlier observations, which showed that ....
        Reference to previous research (contradict)

        However, the findings of the current study do not support the previous research.
        This study has been unable to demonstrate that ....
        However, this result has not previously been described.
        In contrast to earlier findings, however, no evidence of X was detected.
        Although, these results differ from some published studies (Smith, 1992; Jones, 1996), they are consistent with those of ......
        These results differ from X's 2003 estimate of Y, but they are broadly consistent with earlier ....

    Explanations for results:
        There are several possible explanations for this result.
        These differences can be explained in part by the proximity of X and Y.
        A possible explanation for this might be that ....
        Another possible explanation for this is that ....
        This result may be explained by the fact that ..../ by a number of different factors.
        It is difficult to explain this result, but it might be related to ....
        It seems possible that these results are due to ......
        The reason for this is not clear but it may have something to do with ....
        It may be that these students benefitted from ....
        This inconsistency/discrepancy may be due to ....
        This rather contradictory result may be due to ....
        These factors may explain the relatively good correlation between X and Y.
        There are, however, other possible explanations.
        The possible interference of X can not be ruled out.
        The observed increase in X could be attributed to ....
        The observed correlation between X and Y might be explained in this way. .....
        Some authors 9,30 have speculated that ....
        Since this difference has not been found elsewhere it is probably not due to ....
        A possible explanation for some of our results may be the lack of adequate ....

    Advising cautious interpretation
        These data must be interpreted with caution because ....
        These results therefore need to be interpreted with caution.
        However, with a small sample size, caution must be applied, as the findings might not be transferable to ....
        These findings cannot be extrapolated to all patients.
        Although exclusion of X did not reduce the effect on X, these results should be interpreted with caution.
        However, with a small sample size, caution must be applied, as the findings might not be transferable to ....
        It is important to bear in mind the possible bias in these responses.

    Suggesting general hypotheses
        The value of X suggests that a weak link may exist between ....
        It is therefore likely that such connections exist between ....
        It can thus be suggested that ....
        It is possible to hypothesise that these conditions are less likely to occur in ....
        It is possible/likely/probable therefore that ....
        Hence, it could conceivably be hypothesised that ....
        These findings suggest that ....
        It may be the case therefore that these variations ....
        In general, therefore, it seems that ....
        It is possible, therefore, that ....
        Therefore, X could be a major factor, if not the only one, causing ....
        It can therefore be assumed that the ....
        This finding, while preliminary, suggests that .…

    Noting implications
        This finding has important implications for developing ....
        An implication of this is the possibility that ....
        One of the issues that emerges from these findings is ....
        Some of the issues emerging from this finding relate specifically to ....
        This combination of findings provides some support for the conceptual premise that ....
        These findings may help us to understand ....
        These results provide further support for the hypothesis that ....
    Commenting on findings
        However, these results were not very encouraging.
        These findings are rather disappointing.
        The test was successful as it was able to identify students who ....
        The present results are significant in at least major two respects.
        These findings will doubtless be much scrutinized, but there are some immediately dependable conclusions for .…
        The results of this study do not explain the occurrence of these adverse events.

    Suggestions for future work
        However, more research on this topic needs to be undertaken before the association between X and Y is more clearly understood.
        Further research should be done to investigate the .....
        Research questions that could be asked include ....
        Future studies on the current topic are therefore recommended.
        A further study with more focus on X is therefore suggested.
        Further studies, which take these variables into account, will need to be undertaken.
        Further work is required to establish this.
        In future investigations it might be possible to use a different X in which ....
        This is an important issue for future research.
        Several questions reamain unanwswered at present.
        There is abundant room for further progress in determining ....

Writing Conclusions
    Conclusions are shorter sections of academic texts which usually serve two functions. The first is to summarise and bring together the main areas covered in the writing, which might be called "looking back"; and the second is to give a final comment or judgement on this. The final comment may also include making suggestions for improvement and speculating on future directions.
    In dissertations and research papers, conclusions tend to be more complex and will also include sections on significance of the findings and recommendations for future work. Conclusions may be optional in research articles where consolidation of the study and general implications are covered in the Discussion section. However, they are usually expected in dissertations and essays.

    Summarising the content
        This paper has given an account of and the reasons for the widespread use of X ....
        This essay has argued that X is the best instrument to ....
        This assignment has explained the central importance of X in Y.
        This dissertation has investigated ....
        Restatement of aims (research)
        This study set out to determine ....

    Summarising the findings (research)
        This study has shown that ....
        These findings suggest that in general ....

    One of the more significant findings to emerge from this study is that ....
        It was also shown that....
        This study has found that generally ....
        The following conclusions can be drawn from the present study ....
        The relevance of X is clearly supported by the current findings.
        This study/research has shown that ....
        The second major finding was that ....
        The results of this investigation show that ....
        The most obvious finding to emerge from this study is that ....
        X, Y and Z emerged as reliable predictors of ....
        Multiple regression analysis revealed that the ....

    Suggesting implications
        The evidence from this study suggests that ....
        The results of this study indicate that ....
        The results of this research support the idea that ....
        In general, therefore, it seems that ....
        Taken together, these results suggest that ....
        An implication of this is the possibility that ....
        The findings of this study suggest that ....

    Significance of the findings (research contribution)
        This work contributes to existing knowledge X by providing ....
        The X that we have identified therefore assists in our understanding of the role of ....
        These findings enhance our understanding of ....
        This research will serve as a base for future studies and ....
        The current findings add substantially to our understanding of ....
        The current findings add to a growing body of literature on ....
        The study has gone some way towards enhancing our understanding of ....
        The methods used for this X may be applied to other Xs elsewhere in the world.
        The present study, however, makes several noteworthy contributions to ....
        The empirical findings in this study provide a new understanding of ….
        The findings from this study make several contributions to the current literature. First,…
        The present study provides additional evidence with respect to ….
        Taken together, these findings suggest a role for X in promoting Y.
        The present study confirms previous findings and contributes additional evidence that suggests ....
        Significance of the findings with a qualification

    Whilst this study did not confirm X, it did partially substantiate ....
        Despite its exploratory nature, this study offers some insight into ....
        Although the current study is based on a small sample of participants, the findings suggest that ….
        Notwithstanding these  limitations, the study suggests that ….

    Limitations of the current study (research)
        Finally, a number of important limitations need to be considered. First, ....
        A number of caveats need to be noted regarding the present study.
        The most important limitation lies in the fact that ....
        The current investigation was limited by ....
        The current study was unable to analyse these variables.
        The current research was not specifically designed to evaluate factors related to ....
        The current study has only examined ....
        The project was limited in several ways. First, the project used a convenience sample that ....
        However, with a small sample size, caution must be applied, as the findings might not be transferable to ....
        The sample was nationally representative of X but would tend to miss people who were ....
        A limitation of this study is that the numbers of patients and controls were relatively small.
        Thirdly, the study did not evaluate the use of ....
        However, these findings are limited by the use of a cross sectional design.
        The findings in this report are subject to at least three limitations. First, these data apply only to ….
        An issue that was not addressed in this study was whether….
        One source of weakness in this study which could hare affected the measurements of was that ....
        Several limitations to this pilot study need to be acknowledged.  The sample size is .....
        The main weakness of this study was the paucity of ….

    Recommendations for further work (research)
        This research has thrown up many questions in need of further investigation.
        Further work needs to be done to establish whether ....
        It is recommended that further research be undertaken in the following areas:
        Further experimental investigations are needed to estimate ....
        What is now needed is a cross-national study involving ....
        More broadly, research is also needed to determine ....
        It is suggested that the association of these factors is investigated in future studies.
        Further research might explore/investigate ....
        Further research in this field/regarding the role of X would be of great help in ....
        Further investigation and experimentation into X is strongly recommended.
        A number of possible future studies using the same experimental set up are apparent.
        It would be interesting to assess the effects of ....
        More information on X would help us to establish a greater degree of accuracy on this matter.
        If the debate is to be moved forward, a better understanding of .... needs to be developed.
        I suggest that before X is introduced, a study similar to this one should be carried out on ....
        These findings provide the following insights for future research: ....
        Considerably more work will need to be done to determine ....
        Future trials should assess a full selective decontamination regimen including
        More research is needed to better understand when implementation ends and ....
        It would be interesting to compare experiences of individuals within the same … group.
        A further study could assess ….
        A future study investigating X would be very interesting.
        The issue of X is an intriguing one which could be usefully explored in further research.
        Future research should therefore concentrate on the investigation of ….
        More research is required on ....
        Large randomised controlled trials could provide more definitive evidence.

    Implications/recommendations for practice or policy
        These findings suggest several courses of action for ....
        An implication of these findings is that both X and Y should be taken into account when ....
        The findings of this study have a number of important implications for future practice.
        There is, therefore, a definite need for ....
        There are a number of important changes which need to be made.
        Another important practical implication is that ....
        Moreover, more X should be made available to ....
        Other types of X could include : a), b). ....
        Unless governments adopt X, Y will not be attained.
        This information can be used to develop targetted interventions aimed at ....
        A reasonable approach to tackle this issue could be to ....
        Taken together, these findings do not support strong recommendations to ....




Writing Definitions
        In academic work students are often expected to give definitions of key words and phrases in order to demonstrate to their tutors that they understand these terms clearly. Academic writers generally, however, define terms so that their readers understand exactly what is meant when certain key terms are used. When important words are not clearly understood misinterpretation may result. In fact, many disagreements (academic, legal, diplomatic, personal) arise as a result of different interpretations of the same term. In academic writing, teachers and their students often have to explore these differing interpretations before moving on to study a topic.


        Introductory phrases:
            It is necessary here to clarify exactly what is meant by ....
            This shows a need to be explicit about exactly what is meant by the word X.
            X is a term frequently used in the literature, but to date there is no consensus about ....

        Simple three-part definitions

        A university is

        an institution

        where knowledge is "produced" and passed on to others.
        Social Economics may be broadly defined as	the branch of economics

        [which is] concerned with the measurement, causes and consequences of social problems.
        Research may be defined as

        a systematic process

        which consists of three elements or components: (1) a question, problem, or hypothesis, (2) data, and (3) analysis and interpretation of data.
        Braille is

        a system

        of touch reading and writing for blind pople in which raised dots on paper represent the letters of the alphabet.


        General meanings / application of meanings:

        The term X refers to ....
        The term X has come to be used to refer to ....
        The term X is generally understood to mean ....
        The term X has been applied to situations where students ....
        The term X encompasses A), B), and C).


        In broad biological terms, X can be defined as any stimulus that is ....
        The broad use of the term X is sometimes equated with ....
        The term disease refers to a biological event characterised by .....
        In the literature, the term tends to be used to refer to ....
        X can be defined as .... It encompasses ....
        The term X is a relatively new name for a Y, commonly referred to....
        X can be loosely described as a correlation.

        Indicating difficulties in defining a term:

        In the field of language teaching, various definitions of X are found.
        X is a commonly used notion in language learning and yet it is a concept difficult to define precisely.
        A generally accepted definition of X is lacking.
        Smith (2001) identified four abilities that might be subsumed under the term X: a) ....
        The term X embodies a multitude of concepts which ....
        Although differences of opinion still exist, there appears to be some agreement that X refers to ....
        Unfortunately, X remains a poorly defined term.

        Specifying terms that are used in an essay/thesis:

        In this essay, the term overseas student will be used in its broadest sense to refer to all students who ....
        Throughout this thesis, the term education is used to refer to informal systems as well as formal systems.
        While a variety of definitions of the term X have been suggested, this paper will use the definition first suggested by Smith (1968) who saw it as ....
        In this paper, the term that will be used to describe this phenomenon is X
        In this dissertation the terms X and Y are used interchangeably to mean ....
        Referring to people's definitions (author prominent):

        Smith (1954) was apparently the first to use the term ....
        Chomsky writes that a grammar is a 'device of some sort for producing the .....' (1957, p.11).
        According to a definition provided by Smith (2001:23), fluency is 'the maximally ....
        The term "fluency" is used by Smith (2001) to refer to ....
        Smith (2001) uses the term "fluency" to refer to ....
        For Smith (2001), fluency means/refers to ....
        Macro-stabilisation policy is defined by Smith (2003: 119) as "...."
        Aristotle defines the imagination as "the movement which results upon an actual sensation."
        The term "matter" is used by Aristotle in four overlapping senses. First, it is the underlying ..... Secondly, it is the potential which ....
        Smith et al. (2002) have provided a new definition of health: "health is a state of being with physical, cultural, psychological ...."
        In 1987, sports psychologist John Smith popularized the term X to describe ....
        This definition is close to those of Smith (2012) and Jones (2013) who define X as ….

        Referring to people's definitions (author non-prominent):

        Validity is the degree to which an assessment process or device measures what it is intended to measure (Smith et al., 1986)
    Giving Examples
        Writers may give specific examples as evidence to support their general claims or arguments. Examples can also be used to help the reader or listener understand unfamiliar or difficult concepts, and they tend to be easier to remember. For this reason, they are often used in teaching. Finally, students may be required to give examples in their work to demonstrate that they have understood a complex problem or concept.

        Many paragraphs in academic writing show development from general statements to specific details or examples. In most paragraphs, therefore, examples usually come after a more general statement, as in the short extract below.

        Many words can often acquire a more narrow meaning over time, or may come to be chiefly used in one special sense. A classic example of this practice is the word doctor. There were doctors (i.e., learned men) in theology, law, and many other fields beside medicine, but nowadays when we send for the doctor we mean a member of only one profession.

        Examples as the main information in a sentence:

        For example / instance, the word doctor used to mean a learned man.

        For example, Smith and Jones (2004) conducted a series of semi-structured interviews in ......

        By way of illustration, Smith (2003) shows how the data for .....

        A classic / well-known example of this is .......

        An example of this is the study carried out by Smith (2004) in which .......

        X is a good example / illustration of .......

        X illustrates this point / shows this point clearly.

        This can be illustrated briefly by .......

        Young people begin smoking for a variety of reasons. They may, for example, be influenced by their peers, or they may see their parents as role models.

        The evidence of X can be clearly seen in the case of..…

        Another example of what is meant by X is ......

        Diseases that can result at least in part from stress include arthritis, asthma, migrane, headaches and ulcers.

        Examples as additional information in a sentence

        Young people begin smoking for a variety of reasons, such as pressure from peers and the role model of parents.

        Pavlov found that if some other stimulus, for example the ringing of a bell, preceded the food, the dog would start salivating.

        In Paris, Gassendi kept in close contact with many other prominent scholars such as Kepler, Galileo, Hobbes, and Descartes.

        The prices of resources, such as copper, iron ore, oil, coal and aluminium, have declined in real terms over the past 20 years.

        Many diseases can result at least in part from stress, including: arthritis, asthma, migrane, headaches and ulcers.

    Classifying and Listing
        When we classify things, we group and name them on the basis of something that they have in common. By doing this we can understand certain qualities and features which they shares as a class. Classifying is also a way of understanding differences between things. In writing, classifying is often used as a way of introducing a reader to a new topic. Along with writing definitions, the function of classification may be used in the early part of an essay, or longer piece of writing. We list things when we want to treat and present a series of items or different pieces of information systematically. The order of a list may indicate rank importance.
        General Classifications

        X may be divided into	three main
        classes
        sub-groups
        categories
        X may be classified	on the basis of
        according to
        depending on
        in terms of	Y	into Xi and Xii
        Bone is generally classified into two types: cortical bone, also known as ...., and cancellous bone or ....
        Aristotle's systematic treatises may be grouped in several divisions: logic, psychological works, physical ....
        The works of Aristotle fall under three headings: (1) dialogues and ....; (2) collections of facts and ....; and (3) systematic works. There are two basic approaches currently being adopted in research into X. One is the Y approach and the other is ....
        Associative learning can be categorised into classical and operant conditioning. Classical conditioning was first ....
        Generally, spectratyping provides two types of information: band intensity pattern and band number.

        Specific Classifications:

        In the U.S. system, X is graded	according to whether ....
        on the basis of ....
        in terms of
        Smith (1966)	divided
        classified
        grouped	Xs	into two broad types: Xi's and Xii's
        Thomas and Nelson (1996) describe	four basic types of	validity: logical, content, criterion and contruct.
        Smith and Jones (2003) argue that there are two broad categories of Y, which are: a) .... and b) ....
        For Aristotle, motion is of four kinds: (1) motion which ....; (2) motion which ....; (3) motion which ....; and (4) motion which....

        Introducing Lists:

        The key aspects of management can be listed as follows: X, Y and Z.
        During his tour of Britian, he visited the following industrial centres: Manchester, Leeds, Bristol, and Birmingham.
        There are three reasons why the English language has become so dominant. These are:
        There are two types of effect which result when a patient undergoes X. These are ....
        Appetitive stimuli have three separable basic functions. Firstly, they .... Secondly, they ....

        The disadvantages of the new approach can be discussed under three headings, which are: ....
        This topic can best be treated under three headings: X, Y and Z.

        This section has been included for several reasons: it is ....; it illustrates ....; and it describes....

        The "Mass for Four Voices" consists of five movements, which are: the Kyrie, Gloria, Credo, Santus and Agnus Dei.
        The "Three Voices for Mass" is divided into six sections. These are: the Kyrie, Gloria, .....
        Refering to other people's lists

        Smith (2003) suggests three conditions for its acceptance. Firstly, X should be .... Secondly, it needs to be.... Thirdly, .....
        Smith and Jones (1991) list X, Y and Z as the major causes of infant mortality.
        Smith and Jones (2003) argue that there are two broad categories of Y, which are: a) .... and b) ....
        For Aristotle, motion is of four kinds: (1) motion which ....; (2) motion which ....; (3) motion which ....; and (4) motion which....
        Smith (2003) lists the main features of X as follows: it is X; it is Y; and it has Z.

    Describing Causes and Effects
        A great deal of academic work involves understanding and suggesting solutions to problems. At postgraduate level, particularly in applied fields, students search out problems to study. In fact, one could say that problems are the food for a significant proportion of academic activity. However, solutions cannot be suggested unless the problem is fully analysed, and this involves a thorough understanding of the causes. Some of the language that you may find useful for explaining causes and effects is listed below:

        Verbs expressing causality

        Lack of protein	may cause
        can lead to
        can result in	mental retardation.
        Low levels of chlorine in the body	can give rise to	high blood presssure.
        Much of the instability	stems from	the economic effects of the war.
        Kwashiorkor is a disease
        Beri-beri is a disease
        Scurvy is a disease	caused by
        resulting from
        stemming from	insufficient protein.
        vitamin deficiency.
        lack of vitamin C.
        Nouns expressing causality

        The most likely causes of X are poor diet and lack of exercise.

        A consequence of vitamin A deficiency is blindness.
        Physical activity is an important factor in maintaining fitness.
        Many other medications have an influence on cholesterol levels.
        Another reason why Xs are considered to be important is that .......
        Prepositional phrases expressing causality

        200,000 people per year become deaf	owing to
        because of
        as a result of	a lack of iodine.
        Sentence connectors expressing causality

        If undernourished and retarded children do survive to become adults, they have decreased learning ability.	Therefore,
        Consequently,
        Because of this,
        As a result (of this),	when they grow up, it will probably be difficult for them to find work.
        Adverbial phrases expressing causality

        Malnutrition leads to illness and a reduced ability to work in adulthood,	thus/thereby	perpetuating the poverty cycle.
        The warm air rises above the surface of the sea,	thus/thereby	creating an area of low pressure.
        Other examples

        As a consequence of X , it appears that winds alone are not the causative factor of.......
        Due to X and Y inflowing surface water becomes more dense as it .......
        X and Y are important driving factors of Z.
        The mixing of X and Y exerts a powerful effect upon Z through ......
        Possible cause and effect relationships (expressed tentatively)

        This suggests a weak link may exist between X and Y.
        The human papilloma virus is linked to most cervical cancer.
        Stomach cancer in many cases may be associated with certain bacterial infections.
        A high consumption of seafood could be associated with infertility.
        There is some evidence that X may affect Y.

    Comparing and Contrasting
        By understanding similarities and differences between two things, we can increase our understanding and learn more about both. This usually involves a process of analysis, in which we compare the specific parts as well as whole. Comparison may also be a preliminary stage of evaluation. For example, by comparing specific aspects of A and B, we can decide which is more useful or valuable. Many paragraphs whose function is to compare or contrast will begin with an introductory sentence expressed in general terms. Note the introductory sentences below:
        Introductory Sentences: Differences

        X is different from Y in a number of respects.
        There are a number of important differences between X and Y.
        X differs from Y in a number of important ways.
        Smith (2003) found distinct differences between X and Y.

        Women and men differ not only in physical attributes but also in the way in which they ....

        Introductory Sentences: Similarities

        The mode of processing used by the right brain is similar to that used by the left brain.
        The mode of processing used by the right brain is comparable in complexity to that used by the left brain.
        The effects of nitrous dioxide on human health are similar to those of ground level ozone.
        Both X and Y generally take place in a "safe environment".

        There are a number of similarities between X and Y.
        Numerous studies have compared the brain cells in man and animals and found that the cells are essentially identical.

        Comparison within one sentence

        In contrast to oral communities, it is very difficult to get away from calendar time in literate societies.

        Compared with people in oral cultures, people in literate cultures organise their lives around clocks and calendars.

        Oral societies tend to be more concerned with the present whereas literate societies have a very definite awareness of the past.

        Whereas Ghazali rejected non-Islamic philosophers, Aquinas incorporated ancient Greek thought into his own philosophical writings.

        Women's brains process language simultaneously in the two sides of the brain, while men tend to process it in the left side only.

        This interpretation contrasts with that of Smith and Jones (2004) who argue that ......

        Comparison within one sentence (comparative forms)

        Women are faster/slower than men at certain precision manual tasks, such as placing pegs in holes on a board.
        Women tend to perform better/worse than men on tests of perceptual speed.
        Further, men are more/less accurate in tests of target-directed motor skills.
        The corpus callosum, a part of the brain connecting the two hemispheres, may be more/less extensive in women.

        Women are more/less likely than men to suffer aphasia when the front part of the brain is damaged.
        Adolescents are less likely to be put to sleep by alcohol than adults.

        Women tend to have greater/less verbal fluency than men.
        Men learned the route in fewer trials and made fewer errors than did women.

        Indicating difference across two sentences

        It is very difficult to get away from calendar time in literate societies. By contrast/in contrast, many people in oral communities have little idea of the calendar year of their birth.

        It is very difficult to get away from calendar time in literate societies. On the other hand, many people in oral communities have little idea of the calendar year of their birth.

        Indicating similarity across two sentences

        Young children learning their first language need simplified input. Similarly, low level adult L2 learners need graded input supplied in most cases by a teacher.
        Young children learning their first language need simplified input. Likewise, low level adult L2 learners need graded input supplied in most cases by a teacher.

        Speech functions are less likely to be affected in women because the critical area is less often affected. A similar pattern emerges in studies of the control of hand movements.

    Writing about the Past
        Writing about the past in English is made diffcult by the rather complex tense system. However the phrases grouped below give an indication of the uses of the main tenses in academic writng. For a comprehensive explanation of the uses of the various tenses you will need to consult a good English grammar book. A good recommendation is Practical English Usage by Michael Swan, OUP.
        Time phrases associated with the use of the simple past tense (specific times or periods of time in the past completed)

        For centuries,

        In the second half of the 19th century,

        At the end of the nineteenth century,

        church authorities placed restrictions on academics.

        During the Nazi period,
        Between 1933 and 1945,

        From 1933 to 1945,

        In the 1930s and 1940s,

        restrictions were placed on German academics.
        Reference to single investigations or publications in the past: simple past tense used

        The first systematic study of the X was reported by Patel et al. in 1986.
        Erythromycin was originally isolated from X in a soil sample from ...... (Wang et al., 1952).
        In 1975, Smith et al. published a paper in which they described .....
        In 1990 Patel et al. demonstrated that replacement of H2O with heavy water led to ......
        Thirty years later, Smith (1974) reported three cases of Candida Albicans which .......
        In the 1950s Gunnar Myrdal pointed to some of the ways in which …………… (Myrdal, 1957)
        In 1981, Smith and co workers demonstrated that X induced in vitro resistance to .......
        In 1984 Jones et al. made several amino acid esters of X and evaluated them as water-soluble pro-drugs.
        An experimental demonstration of this effect was first carried out by ......
        The first experimental realisation of ......, by Smith et al. [12], used a ......

        Time phrases associated with the use of the present perfect tense (for situations/actions which began in the past and continue up to the present, or for which the period of time is unspecified):

        Over the past few decades, the world has seen the stunning transformation of X, Y and Z.
        Since 1965, these four economies have doubled their share of world production and trade.
        Until recently, there has been little interest in X.
        Recently, these questions have been addressed by researchers in many fields.
        In recent years researchers have investigated a variety of approaches to X but ....
        Up to now, the research has tended to focus on X rather than on Y.
        To date, little evidence has been found associating X with Y.
        So far, three factors have been identified as being potentially important: X, Y, and Z.

        The present perfect tense may also be used to describe recent research or scholarly activity with focus on the area of enquiry - usually more than one study

        There have been several investigations into the causes of illiteracy (Smith, 1985; Jones, 1987).
        The relationship between a diet high in fats and poor health has been widely investigated (Smith, 1985, Jones, 1987, Johnson, 1992).
        The new material has been shown to enhance cooling properties (Smith, 1985, Jones, 1987, Johnson, 1992).
        Invasive plants have been identified as major contributing factors for the decline of many North American species (1).
        A considerable amount of literature has been published on X.
    Describing Trends and Projections
            A trend is a description of change over time. A projection is a prediction of future change. Trends and projections are usually illustrated using line graphs in which the horizontal axis represents time. Some of the language commonly used for writing about trends and projections is given below.
            Describing trends

            The graph shows that there has been a	slight
            gradual
            steady
            marked
            steep
            sharp	increase
            rise
            decrease
            fall
            decline
            drop	in the number of divorces in England and Wales since 1981.
            Describing high and low points in figures

            The number of live births outside marriage reached a peak during the second world war.
            The peak age for committing a crime is 18.
            Oil production peaked in 1985.
            Gas production reached a (new) low in 1990.

            Projecting trends

            The number of Xs
            The amount of Y

            The rate of Z

            is projected to
            is expected to

            is likely to

            will probably

            decline steadily
            drop sharply

            level off

            after 2010.

    Describing Quantities
        Describing ratios and proportions
        The proportion of live births outside marriage reached one in ten in 1945.
        The annual birth rate dropped from 44.4 to 38.6 per 1000 per annun.
        Describing fractions

        Of the 148 patients who completed the questionnaire, just over half indicated that .......
        The response rate was 60% at six months and 56% at 12 months.
        Over half of those surveyed indicated that ......
        70% of those who were interviewed indicated that .....
        Approximately half of those surveyed did not comment on ......
        Nearly half of the respondents (48%) agreed that ......
        Less than a third of those who responded (32%) indicated that ......
        The number of first marriages in the United Kingdom fell by nearly two-fifths.
    Describing percentages
        13.1% of young men and 23.1% of young women who had married said that they ......
        Returned surveys from 34 radiologists yielded a 34% response rate.
        The response rate was 60% at six months and 56% at 12 months.
        East Anglia had the lowest proportion of lone parents at only 14 per cent.
        Since 1981, England has experienced an 89 % increase in crime.
        The mean income of the bottom 20 percent of U.S. families declined from $10,716 in 1970 to .......
        A study in Java found that of 2,558 abortions, 58% were in young women aged 15-24, of whom 62% were .....
        He also noted that less than 10% of the articles included in his study cited ......
        In 1960 just over 5% of live births in 1960 were outside marriage.

        Describing averages

        This figure can be seen as the average life expectancy at various ages.
        The proposed model suggests a steep decline in mean life expectancy ......
        Roman slaves probably had a lower than average life expectancy.
        The average of 12 observations in the X, Y and Z is 19.2 mgs/m .....
        The mean score for the two trials was subjected to multivariate analysis of variance to determine ......
        The mean income of the bottom 20 percent of U.S. families declined from $10,716 in 1970 to .......
    Describing ranges
        The evidence shows that life expectancy from birth lies in the range of twenty to thirty years.
        Between 575 and 590 metres depth the sea floor is extremely flat, with an average slope of only 1 : 400
        The mean income of the bottom 20 percent of U.S. families declined from $10,716 in 1970 to $9,833 in 1990.
        The respondents had practiced for an average of 15 years (range 6 to 35 years)
        The participants were aged 19 to 25 and were from both rural and urban backgrounds.
        They calculated ranges of journal use from 10.7%–36.4% for the humanities, 25%–57% for the ......
        Rates of decline ranged from 2.71– 0.08 cm day-1 (Table 11) with a mean of 0.97 cm day-1.



        It has been estimated that 300,000 people suffer form ......

Transition Statements
        In longer pieces of work, writers are expected to indicate to the reader when they are moving from one topic to another, or from on section of text to another. These are known as transition statements and some examples of these are given below.
        Introducing a new topic or aspect of a topic
        As regards X, ….
        With respect to  X, ….
        With regard to X, ….
        Regarding X, ….
        As far as X is concerned, ….
        In terms of X, ….
    Reintroducing a topic
        As was pointed out in the introduction to this paper, ....
        As was mentioned in the previous chapter, ....
        As explained earlier, ....
        As described on the previous page, ....
        Returning (briefly) to the (subject/issue) of X, ….
        Moving from one section to the next

        So far this paper/chapter has focussed on X. The following section will discuss ....
        Before proceeding to examine X, it will be necessary to .....
        Before employing these theories to examine X, it is necessary to .....
        Having defined what is meant by X, I will now move on to discuss .....
        Having discussed how to construct X, the final section of this paper addresses ways of
        This section has analysed the causes of X and has argued that ..... The next part of this paper will ....
        This chapter has demonstrated that ..... It is now necessary to explain the course of .....
        Turning now to the experimental evidence on .....
        This (chapter) follows on from the previous (chapter), which (examined/laid out/outlined) X.

        Moving from one section to the next whilst indicating addition, contrast or opposition

        In addition, it is important to ask ....
        On the other hand, in spite of much new knowledge about the role of ....,
        However, this system also has a number of serious drawbacks.
        Despite this, little progress has been made in the ....

    Previewing a following section
        This raises questions about .... which will seek to answer in the next chapter.
            The next chapter describes synthesis and evaluation of ....
            The section that follows, it will be argued that ....
            The following is a brief report on a ....
            What follows is a description/outline/account of …
            The problem of X is discussed in the following section.
            Transition statements for results and discussion
            Turning now to the experimental evidence on .....

        Comparing the two results, it can be seen that .....
            A comparison of the two results reveals ....
            As pointed out in the introduction to this paper, ....
            From the previous discussion, it can be seen that .....
            It is also worth noting that X is significantly more frequent in ....
            The differences between X and Y are highlighted in Table 4
